Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1984 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1984, 1996, 2008, and 2016 to make other minor word changes.

Cross references. —

For provisions transferring the duties of the former Department of Public Works and the former Department of Highways to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, see Executive Order No. 39 (1977) in the pamphlet of executive orders. For provisions related to marine pilots, see AS 08.62.